Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 1.6 National Criminal Records Check System

12-1.6-1.
Automated fingerprint identification system database.

The department of attorney general may establish and maintain an automated fingerprint identification system database that would allow the department to store and maintain all fingerprints submitted in accordance with the national criminal records check system. The automated fingerprint identification system database would provide for an automatic notification if, and when, a subsequent criminal arrest fingerprint card is submitted to the system that matches a set of fingerprints previously submitted in accordance with a national criminal records check. If the aforementioned arrest results in a conviction, the department shall immediately notify those individuals and entities with which that individual is associated and who are required to be notified of disqualifying information concerning national criminal records checks as provided in chapters 17, 17.4, 17.7.1 of title 23 or §

23-1-52

and chapter 7.2 of title 42 or §§

42-7.2-18.2

and

42-7.2-18.4

. The information in the database established under this section is confidential and not subject to disclosure under chapter 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

12-1.6-2.
Long-term healthcare workers — High-risk Medicaid providers and personal care attendants.

The department of attorney general shall maintain an electronic web-based system to assist facilities, licensed under chapters 17, 17.4, 17.7.1 of title 23 or §

23-1-52

, and the executive office of health and human services under §§

42-7.2-18.1

and

42-7.2-18.3

, required to check relevant registries and conduct national criminal records checks of routine contact patient employees, personal care attendants, and high-risk providers. The department of attorney general shall provide for an automated notice, as authorized in §

12-1.6-1

, to those facilities or to the executive office of health and human services if a routine-contact patient employee, personal care attendant, or high-risk provider is subsequently convicted of a disqualifying offense, as described in the relevant licensing statute or in §§

42-7.2-18.2

and

42-7.2-18.4

. The department of attorney general may charge a facility a one-time, set-up fee of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for access to the electronic web-based system under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

12-1.6-3.
Immunity from liability.

The department of attorney general; the department of health; or an employer who disqualifies an applicant from employment or continued employment; on the basis of a disqualification notice as described in §

12-1.6-2

, or of a national criminal records check relating to disqualifying information, shall not be liable for civil damages or subject to any claim, demand, cause of action, or proceeding of any nature as a result of the disqualification.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 399, § 1.

12-1.6-4.
Rules and regulations.

The department of attorney general may promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 399, § 1.